Tennessee, session 114, HB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-109(e)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(e)
(1)
(A) Criminal exposure of another to HIV is a Class B
misdemeanor.
(B) Criminal exposure of another to HIV if the person transmitted
HIV to another is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1106
001153
- 1 -